North Dakota statutes. TITLE 60 Warehousing and Deposits
CHAPTER 60-02.1 Grain Buyers
60-02.1-40.
Agricultural contracts — Mediation and arbitration.

If a written contract for the sale of grain does not contain provisions to settle disagreements concerning factors not governed by section 60-02.1-05, the parties shall attempt to resolve the disagreements through mediation or arbitration.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 558, § 2.

60-02.1-41.
Roving grain buyers — Exception — Applicability of provisions.

Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter does not apply to any person that purchases, solicits, or merchandises grain, which has been cleaned, processed, and made ready for consumption, from a public warehouseman licensed and bonded under chapter 60-02. If the person engages in any activity other than those described in this section, the person is subject to the law governing those other activities.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 551, § 1; 2009, ch. 591, § 1; 2021, ch. 487, § 26, effective July 1, 2021.